apertium-arg.arg.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 4
	Entries: 48073
	Sdefs: 74
	Paradigms: 580
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix apertium-arg.arg.dix fixed.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronimo"/> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="top" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" 	c="Pronombre"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adchectivo"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="femenino"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="masculino"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="masc-fem"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="plural"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="adverbio"/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="abbr" /> 
    <sdef n="infps" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Cherundio"/> 
    <sdef n="gerps" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Participio"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c="Present d'indicativo"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" 	c="Imperfecto d'indicativo"/> 
    <sdef n="pmp" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" 	c="Pasato d'indicativo"/> 
    <sdef n="fti" 	c="Futuro"/> 
    <sdef n="cni" 	c="Condicional"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present de Subchuntivo"/> 
    <sdef n="pis" 	c="Imperfecto de Subchuntivo"/> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperativo"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  
<pardef n="hd-hour">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]</re></e>
  <e>       <re>[01][0-9]</re></e>
  <e>       <re>2[0-3]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-separator">
  <e>       <i>:</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-minute">
  <e>       <re>[012345][0-9]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hour-digital">
  <e>       <par n="hd-hour"/><par n="hd-separator"/><par n="hd-minute"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  
  
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>¿</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>

    
</pardef>
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <!--      <re>(www.|http://|https://|ftp://)[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-./]+[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9/]</re> -->
<re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ordinals">
  <e>       <re>[13]</re><p><l>r</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[13]</re><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[13]</re><p><l>rs</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[13]</re><p><l>as</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>2</re><p><l>o</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>2</re><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>2</re><p><l>os</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>2</re><p><l>as</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[4-9]</re><p><l>o</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[4-9]</re><p><l>n</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[4-9]</re><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[4-9]</re><p><l>os</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[4-9]</re><p><l>ns</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[4-9]</re><p><l>as</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>o</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>n</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>os</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>ns</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>as</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.º</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>.ª</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.º</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>.ª</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>º</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]</re><p><l>ª</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>º</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><re>[1-9]+[0-9]+</re><p><l>ª</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ip">
  <e>       <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="eco-">
  <e>       <p><l>eco</l>       <r>eco</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eco-</l>      <r>eco</r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ex-">
  <e>       <p><l>ex</l>        <r>ex</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ex<b/></l>    <r>ex</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ex-</l>       <r>ex</r></p></e>
</pardef>

    
<pardef n="/u_to__var">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>to</l>        <r>u</r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/a_á__var">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>á</l>         <r>a</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/us_tos__var">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tos</l>       <r>us</r></p></e>


  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us</r></p></e>


</pardef>

<e lm="exbarcelonista">  <par n="ex-"/><i>barcelonista</i><par n="social__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ecoeficient">     <par n="eco-"/><i>efici</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exmadridista">    <par n="ex-"/><i>madridista</i><par n="social__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exmallorquinista"><par n="ex-"/><i>mallorquinista</i><par n="social__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exzaragocista">   <par n="ex-"/><i>zaragocista</i><par n="social__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exbarcelonista">  <par n="ex-"/><i>barcelonista</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>
<e lm="exconsellero">    <par n="ex-"/><i>consell</i><par n="vaqu/ero__n"/></e>
<e lm="ecoeficiencia">   <par n="eco-"/><i>eficiencia</i><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
<e lm="exespía">         <par n="ex-"/><i>espía</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>
<e lm="ecofinanciación"> <par n="eco-"/><i>financia</i><par n="actua/ción__n"/></e>
<e lm="ecoinnovación">   <par n="eco-"/><i>innova</i><par n="actua/ción__n"/></e>
<e lm="exmadridista">    <par n="ex-"/><i>madridista</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>
<e lm="exmallorquinista"><par n="ex-"/><i>mallorquinista</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exministro"><par n="ex-"/><p><l>menistr</l><r>ministr</r></p><par n="amig/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="exministro">      <par n="ex-"/><i>ministr</i><par n="amig/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="exmuller">        <par n="ex-"/><i>muller</i><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exmuller"> <par n="ex-"/><p><l>mullé</l><r>muller</r></p><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
<e lm="exrepublica">     <par n="ex-"/><i>republica</i><par n="luenga__n"/></e>
<e lm="exzaragocista">   <par n="ex-"/><i>zaragocista</i><par n="accionista__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a los pietz de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l>'ls<b/>pietz<b/></l><r><b/>los<b/>pietz<b/></r></p><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a causa de">      <par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>causa<b/></i><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a disposición de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>disposición<b/></i><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a falta de">      <par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>falta<b/></i><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a l'atro'l día"><par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>l'</i><par n="atr_altr_otr__var"/><p><l>o'l<b/>diya</l><r>o'l<b/>día</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
<e lm="a la fin de">     <par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>la<b/>fin<b/></i><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a lo menos">      <par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>lo<b/>menos</i><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a meyaus de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>mediaus<b/></l><r><b/>meyaus<b/></r></p><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a comienzos de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>principios<b/></l><r><b/>comienzos<b/></r></p><par n="contde__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a sobén">  <par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>sobén</l><r><b/>sobén</r></p><par n="agora__adv"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a los solos efectos de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l>'ls<b/>solos<b/>efectos<b/></l><r><b/>los<b/>solos<b/>efectos<b/></r></p><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="dica__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a comienzos de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>escomencipios<b/></l><r><b/>comienzos<b/></r></p><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="dica__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a lo costau de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>lo<b/>costato<b/></l><r><b/>lo<b/>costau<b/></r></p><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="dica__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a modo de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><i><b/>modo<b/></i><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="dica__pr"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="a riesgo y periglo de"><par n="/a_á__var"/><p><l><b/>risco<b/>y<b/>periglo<b/></l><r><b/>risgo<b/>y<b/>periglo<b/></r></p><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="dica__pr"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="hour-digital"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ip"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
